Utah statutes.
58-63-307.   Use of firearms.

(1)  An individual licensed as an armored car security officer or an armed private security officer may carry a firearm only while acting as an armored car security officer or an armed private security officer in accordance with this chapter and rules made under this chapter.

(2)  An individual licensed as an armored car security officer or an armed private security officer is exempt from the provisions of Section 76-10-505 and Title 53, Chapter 5, Part 7, Concealed Weapon Act, while acting as an armored car security officer or an armed private security officer in accordance with this chapter and rules made under this chapter.

